District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Streamlining Medicaid Credentialing Amendment Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. The Department of Health Care Finance Establishment Act of 2007, effective
February 27, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-109; D.C. Official Code § 7-771.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2 is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (2A) is added to read as follows:
“(2A) “Complete application” means a credentialing application submitted by a
provider to a centralized credentialing verification organization as established in section 8e.”.
(2) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
“(10) “Provider” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 2(7) of the
Prompt Pay Act of 2002, effective July 23, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-176; D.C. Official Code § 31-
3131(7)).
(b) A new section 8e is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 8e. Medicaid provider consolidated credentialing.
“(a) By no later than January 1, 2027, the Mayor shall develop and implement a single,
consolidated, and exclusive application process for providers seeking to be credentialed or
recredentialed with a managed care organization (“MCO”) under the District’s Medicaid
program. A provider whose credentials are approved by the Department shall be deemed
credentialed with all MCOs, and an MCO shall not require a provider to
be separately credentialed by that MCO in order to receive reimbursement.
“(b)(1) If the Department receives an incomplete application for a provider to be
credentialed or recredentialed, the Department shall return the application to the provider at the
address listed in the application within 10 days of receiving the application.

“(2) The Department shall notify the provider on what information is missing
from their application.
“(3) The time period for approving or disapproving the application set forth in
subsection (c) of this section shall be suspended while the application is deemed incomplete.
“(c)(1) Within 30 days of receiving a complete application, and upon determination that
the provider has a valid District professional or occupational license to provide the health care
services to which the credentialing would apply, the Department shall issue a temporary
credential to the provider, which shall be effective upon issuance and remain effective until the
provider’s credentialing application has been finally approved or denied; provided, that the
Department shall not issue temporary credentials to the provider if they have reported on their
application:
“(A) Any medical or other professional or occupational malpractice
claims;
“(B) A criminal record; or
“(C) Any medical or other licensing board, state, or federal disciplinary
action, including suspension from participating in a federal or state program.
“(2) The Department shall mail to the provider at the address listed on their
application written notice of either the Department’s issuance of temporary credentials to the
provider or rejection of their application and an explanation for the rejection.
“(d) The Department may not require a provider to recredential if:
“(1) The provider federal tax identification number changes;
“(2) The federal tax identification number of the provider’s employer changes; or
“(3) Their employer changes; provided, that their new employer is:

(A) A participating provider on any of the District’s MCO provider
panels; or
(B) The employer of providers that participate on any of the MCO’s
provider panels.
“(e) MCO plans shall upload all provider information on all applicable billing platforms,
including any subcontractors and vendors, within 7 business days of the Department’s issuance
of temporary credentials to the provider.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
100 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
101 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).